src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#golbma             K                ;
             golbma+Num+Ess:#logi#golbma%>n          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#golbma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#golmma             K                ;
       golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#golmma             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#golmma%>s          K                ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#golmma%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#golbmi%>j          K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#golmma             K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#golmma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#golmma%>t          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#golmma%>jde        K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#golmma%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#golbma         K                ;
             golbma+Num+Ess:#logi#golbma%>n          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#golbma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#golmma             K                ;
       golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#golmma             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#golmma%>s          K                ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#golmma%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#golbmi%>j          K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#golmma             K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#golmma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#golmma%>t          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#golmma%>jde        K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#golmma%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#golbma             K                ;
             golbma+Num+Ess:e#logi#golbma%>n          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#golbma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#golmma             K                ;
       golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#golmma             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#golmma%>s          K                ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#golmma%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#golbmi%>j          K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#golmma             K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#golmma             K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#golmma%>t          K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd       K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#golmma%>jde        K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#guvtti%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:htta#logi#golbma         K                ;
             golbma+Num+Ess:htta#logi#golbma%>n      K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#golbma         K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#golmma         K                ;
       golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#golmma         NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#golmma%>s      K                ;
 golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#golmma%>n      K                ; ! !SOUTH
          golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#golbmi%>j      K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#golmma         K                ;
     golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#golmma         K                ;
          golbma+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#golmma%>t      K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd   K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd   K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd   K                ;
     golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd   K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#golmma%>jde    K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K                ;
          golbma+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#golmma%>jguin  K                ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#njeallje           K                ;
             njeallje+Num+Ess:#logi#njeallji%>n        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#njeallje           K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#njealji            K                ;
       njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#njealje            NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#njealji%>s         K                ;
 njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#njealji%>n         K                ; ! !SOUTH
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#njealljá%>j        K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#njealji            K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#njealji            K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#njealji%>t         K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
     njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd       K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#njelji%>jde        K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K                ;
          njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#njelji%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA   ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA   ;
   vihttalogi:vi             VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA   ;
   guhttalogi:gu             VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA   ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIGOLBMA   ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA   ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA   ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIGOLBMA   ;
